Oklahoma, session 2025, SB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1277.

UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES

A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in

possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the

provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed

or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:

1. Any structure, building, or office space which is owned or

leased by a city, town, county, state, or federal governmental

authority for the purpose of conducting business with the public;



Req. No. 662 Page 1

2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility

or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,

prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,

except as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma

Statutes;

3. Any public or private elementary or public or private

secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this

section;

4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during

a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;

5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless

allowed by the property owner;

6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and

7. Any property set aside by a county, city, town, public trust

with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state governmental

authority for an event that is secured with minimum-security minimum

security provisions. For purposes of this paragraph, a minimum-

security minimum security provision consists of a location that is

secured utilizing the following:

a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight

(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and

is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized

entry,



Req. No. 662 Page 2

b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,

commissioned peace officer, and

c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise

travel with their property through or by the metal

detector.

B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or

unconcealed firearm on the following properties:

1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any

vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county,

state, or federal governmental authority;

2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any

vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the

public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;

3. Any property adjacent to a structure, building, or office

space in which concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by

the provisions of this section;

4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state

governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife

refuge, wildlife management area, or fairgrounds; provided, nothing

in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize any entry by a

person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed firearm into any

structure, building, office space, or event which is specifically

prohibited by the provisions of subsection A of this section;



Req. No. 662 Page 3

5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or

secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether

attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be

stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor

vehicle is left unattended on school property; and

6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,

town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or

state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that

is without minimum-security minimum security provisions, as such

term is defined in paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section;

provided, the carry of firearms within said the permitted event area

shall be limited to concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise

authorized by the holder of the event permit; and

7. Any state-owned hotel, cabin, or lodge.

Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or

subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or

allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A

of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect

of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license

or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or

possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.

C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto

private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any

private school for transportation of students or teachers by a

Req. No. 662 Page 4

pers on who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,

provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the

private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a

weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle

used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or

willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school

that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on

private school property, a school bus, or vehicle used by the

private school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries

arising from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this

subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative

Workers’ Compensation Act.

D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,

a board of education of a school district may adopt a policy

pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to

authorize the carrying of a handgun onto school property by school

personnel specifically designated by the board of education,

provided such personnel either:

1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for

in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or

2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided

for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority

granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.

Req. No. 662 Page 5

E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this

section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of

any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:

1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section

176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or

2. A nonprofit entity,

an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not

openly carry a handgun on the property.

F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of

subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a

misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty

Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of

subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the

property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to

leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may

be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty

Dollars ($250.00).

G. No person in possession of a valid handgun license issued

pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or who

is carrying or in possession of a firearm as otherwise permitted by

law or who is carrying or in possession of a machete, blackjack,

loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles shall be authorized to

carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or

metal knuckles into or upon any college, university, or technology

Req. No. 662 Page 6

cent er school property, except as provided in this subsection. For

purposes of this subsection, the following property shall not be

construed to be college, university, or technology center school

property:

1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor

vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,

machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are

carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,

blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles are not

removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the

college or university president or technology center school

administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or

technology center school property;

2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,

machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, hand chains, or metal knuckles

by college, university, or technology center school policy; and

3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the

college or university president or technology center school

administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the

firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal

knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,

or technology center school property.

The college, university, or technology center school may notify

the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a

Req. No. 662 Page 7

viol ation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon

receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall

give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the

hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any

provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an

administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may

have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.

Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be

construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or

technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has

the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a

handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,

machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, or metal knuckles from

possession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, hand

chain, or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2, and

3 of this subsection. Nothing contained in any provision of this

subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of any college,

university, or technology center school in this state from taking

administrative action against any student for any violation of any

provision of this subsection.

H. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the

following:

1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a

firearm in the course of employment;

Req. No. 662 Page 8

2. District judges, associate district judges, and special

district judges, who are in possession of a valid handgun license

issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act

and whose names appear on a list maintained by the Administrative

Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of

employment within the courthouses of this state;

3. Private investigators with a firearms authorization when

acting in the course and scope of employment;

4. Elected officials An elected official of a county, who are

is in possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the

provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed

handgun when acting in the performance of his or her duties within

the courthouses of the county in which he or she was elected. The

provisions of this paragraph shall not allow the elected county

official to carry the handgun into a courtroom;

5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of

the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to

the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a

concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment

within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.

Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff

from requiring additional instruction or training before granting

authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.

The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this

Req. No. 662 Page 9

subs ection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun

into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail, or any

other prisoner detention area; and

6. The board of county commissioners of any county may

authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid

handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma

Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the

course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds

surrounding the county courthouse.

I. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means any

automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, or motorcycle,

as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

equipped with a locked accessory container within or affixed to the

motorcycle.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-662 CN 1/14/2025 3:50:39 PM















Req. No. 662 Page 10